Utah statutes.
9-1-807.   Subcommittees.

(1)  The commission shall create subcommittees to advise and assist the commission in carrying out its duties and responsibilities, including strategic planning.

(2)  These subcommittees shall include Youth Voice, Volunteer Recognition, Evaluation, Community Collaboration, and Resource Development.

(a)  The subcommittee on Youth Voice shall have at least five members between the ages of 16 and 25.  It shall develop and recommend policies and programs to the commission and bring the perspective of young people to all commission discussions and decisions.

(b)  The subcommittee on Volunteer Recognition shall have at least five members.  It shall assist with the implementation of governor's awards relating to exemplary volunteer service in the state, work with individual communities to develop local recognition programs, and explore additional opportunities to recognize individuals and organizations addressing community needs through volunteer service.

(c)  The subcommittee on Evaluation shall have at least five members. It shall evaluate each program funded by the corporation and by state organizations that support the purpose of the commission to assure their on-going quality.

(d)  The subcommittee on Community Collaboration shall have at least five members.  It shall promote communication and information sharing between state and local private and public initiatives to meet community needs.

(e)  The subcommittee on Resource Development shall have at least five members.  It shall develop and implement strategies to secure local, state, and federal resources to reinforce, expand, and initiate quality community programs across the state.

(3)  Subcommittee chairs shall be appointed by the commission chair from among commission members, but the subcommittees' members need not be limited to commission members.

(4)  The commission chair, in consultation with the subcommittee chairs, shall name the committees' members.



Enacted by Chapter 119, 1994 General Session

